Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-190
Banks; possession by department; refusal to deliver; possession by banks; application for court order.

Whenever any bank refuses or neglects to deliver possession of its affairs, assets, or property of whatever nature to the department or to any person ordered or appointed to take charge of such bank according to the Nebraska Banking Act, the director shall make an application to the district court of the county in which the main office of such bank is located or to any judge of such court for an order placing the department or such person in charge thereof and of its affairs and property. If the judge of the district court having jurisdiction is absent from the district at the time such application is to be made, any judge of the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court may grant such order, but the petition and order of possession shall be immediately transmitted to the clerk of the district court of the county in which the main office of such bank is located.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 56, p. 94;

R.S.1913, § 336;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 57, p. 709;

C.S.1922, § 8037;

C.S.1929, § 8-185;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 47, p. 159;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-185;

R.S.1943, § 8-176;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 90, p. 170;

Laws 1987, LB 2, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 12;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 17;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 87.
August 24, 2017